test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-neibb_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - neiʹbb â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: neiʹbb
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: neeiʹb
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: neeiʹb
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: neibba
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: neeiʹbest
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Com+Indef: neeiʹbin
     neiʹbb+N+Ess+Indef: neiʹbben
     neiʹbb+N+Par+Indef: neiʹbbed
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [neeiʹbtaa, neeiʹbtää]
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: neeiʹb
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: neeiʹbi
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: neeiʹbid
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: neeiʹbid
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: neeiʹbin
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Com+Indef: neeiʹbivuiʹm
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [neeiʹbitaa, neeiʹbitää]
